Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 24 Hotels and Public Places

11-24-1.
All persons entitled to full and equal accommodations.

All persons within the jurisdiction of this state shall be entitled to the full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges of any place of public accommodation, resort or amusement, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 28; P.L. 1925, ch. 658, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 28; P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-1

.

11-24-2.
Discriminatory practices prohibited.

No person, being the owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, superintendent, agent, or employee of any place of public accommodation, resort, or amusement shall directly or indirectly refuse, withhold from, or deny to any person on account of race or color, religion, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of that public place. No person shall directly or indirectly publish, circulate, issue, display, post, or mail any written, printed or painted communication, notice, or advertisement, to the effect that any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges of any public accommodation place shall be refused, withheld from, or denied to any person on account of race or color, religion, country of ancestral origin, disability, sex or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or age or that the patronage or custom at that place of any person belonging to or purporting to be of any particular race or color, religion, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression is unwelcome, objectionable, or not acceptable, desired, or solicited. The production of any written, printed, or painted communication, notice, or advertisement, purporting to relate to any public place and to be made by any person being its owner, lessee, proprietor, superintendent, or manager, shall be presumptive evidence in any action that its production was authorized by that person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 28; P.L. 1925, ch. 658, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 28; P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-2

; P.L. 1979, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 1988, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 5.

11-24-2.1.
Discrimination based on disability, age, or sex prohibited.

Whenever in this chapter there shall appear the words “ancestral origin” there shall be inserted immediately thereafter the words “disability, age, or sex.”

“Disability” means a disability as defined in §

42-87-1

.

The terms, as used regarding persons with disabilities, “auxiliary aids and services” and “reasonable accommodation” have the same meaning as those terms are defined in §

42-87-1.1

.

“Otherwise qualified” means a person with a disability who meets the essential eligibility requirements for participation in or receipt of benefits from the program or activity.

Any person with a disability shall be entitled to full and equal access, as other members of the general public to all public accommodations, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

Every person with a disability who has a personal assistive animal or who obtains a personal assistive animal, shall be entitled to full and equal access to all public accommodations provided for in this chapter, and shall not be required to pay extra compensation for a personal assistive animal, but shall be liable for any damage done to the premises by a personal assistive animal.

Nothing in this section shall require any person providing a place of public accommodation to, in any way, incur any greater liability or obligation, or provide a higher degree of care for a person with a disability than for a person who is not disabled.

“Sexual orientation” means having or being perceived as having an orientation for heterosexuality, bisexuality, or homosexuality.

“Gender identity or expression” includes a person’s actual or perceived gender, as well as a person’s gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-related appearance, or gender-related expression, whether or not that gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-related appearance, or gender-related expression is different from that traditionally associated with the person’s sex at birth.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 1988, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 499, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 124, § 2, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 125, § 2, effective July 2, 2021.

11-24-2.2.
Discrimination based on sexual orientation.

Whenever in this chapter the terms “race or color, religion or country of ancestral origin, handicap, age or sex” shall appear, there shall be inserted immediately thereafter the words “sexual orientation”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 7.

11-24-2.3.
Discrimination based on gender identity or expression.

Whenever in this chapter the terms “race or color, religion, country of ancestral origin, handicap, age, sex, or sexual orientation” shall appear, there shall be inserted immediately thereafter the words “gender identity or expression”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 6.

11-24-3.
“Places of public accommodation” construed.

A “Place of public accommodation, resort, or amusement” within the meaning of §§

11-24-1

—

11-24-3

includes, but is not limited to: (1) inns, taverns, roadhouses, hotels, whether conducted for the entertainment or accommodation of transient guests or of those seeking health, recreation or rest; (2) restaurants, eating houses or any place where food is sold for consumption on the premises; (3) buffets, saloons, barrooms, or any stores, parks, or enclosures where spirituous or malt liquors are sold; (4) ice cream parlors, confectioneries, soda fountains, and all stores where ice cream, ice and fruit preparations or their derivatives, or beverages of any kind are retailed for consumption on the premises; (5) retail stores and establishments, dispensaries, clinics, hospitals, rest rooms, bath houses, barber shops, beauty parlors, theaters, motion picture houses, music halls, airdromes, roof gardens, race courses, skating rinks, amusement and recreation parks, fairs, bowling alleys, golf courses, gymnasiums, shooting galleries, billiard and pool parlors, swimming pools, seashore accommodations and boardwalks, and public libraries; (6) garages; (7) all public conveyances operated on land, water or in the air as well as their stations and terminals; (8) public halls and public elevators of buildings occupied by two (2) or more tenants or by the owner and one or more tenants; and (9) public housing projects. Nothing in this section shall be construed to include any place of accommodation, resort, or amusement which is in its nature distinctly private.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 28; P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-3

.

11-24-3.1.
Sex discrimination — Limitation on prohibition.

Nothing contained in this chapter that refers to “sex” shall be construed to mandate joint use of restrooms, bath houses, and dressing rooms by males and females.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 144, § 5.

11-24-3.2.
Age discrimination — Limitation on prohibition.

For the purposes of this chapter, “age” is construed as anyone over the age of eighteen (18).

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 144, § 5.

11-24-4.
Enforcement of anti-discrimination provisions.

The Rhode Island commission for human rights is empowered and directed, as provided in this section, to prevent any person from violating any of the provisions of §§

11-24-1

—

11-24-3

; provided, that before instituting a formal hearing it shall attempt by informal methods of conference, persuasion, and conciliation to induce compliance with those sections. Upon the commission’s own initiative or whenever an aggrieved individual or an organization chartered for the purpose of combating discrimination or racism or of safeguarding civil liberties, or rights of persons with disabilities (that individual or organization being subsequently referred to as the complainant), makes a charge to the commission that any person, agency, bureau, corporation, or association, subsequently referred to as the respondent, has violated or is violating any of the provisions of §§

11-24-1

—

11-24-3

the commission may proceed in the same manner and with the same powers as provided in §§

28-5-16

—

28-5-26

and the provisions of §§

28-5-13

and

28-5-16

—

28-5-36

as to the powers, duties and rights of the commission, its members, hearing examiners, the complainant, respondent, interviewer and the court shall apply in any proceedings under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 29; P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 1.

11-24-5.
Liberal construction of provisions.

The provisions of §§

11-24-1

—

11-24-6

shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of their purposes, and any law inconsistent with their provisions shall not apply. Nothing contained in these sections shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any law of this state relating to discrimination because of race or color, religion or country of ancestral origin, disability, age, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-5

; P.L. 1979, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 1988, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 5.

11-24-6.
Severability of provisions.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of §§

11-24-1

—

11-24-6

or their application to any person or circumstances shall, for any reason, be adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the sections or their application to other persons or circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-6

.

11-24-7.
Discrimination against members of armed forces prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any common carrier, innkeeper, or proprietor or lessee of any place of public amusement or entertainment, or any agent, servant, or representative of any common carrier, innkeeper, proprietor, or lessee, to debar from the full and equal enjoyment of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any public conveyance on land or water, of any inn, or of any place of public amusement or entertainment, any person in the military, air, or naval service of the United States or of this state wearing the uniform prescribed for him or her at that time or place by law, regulation of the service, or custom, on account of his or her wearing the uniform, or being in the military service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 31; P.L. 1908, ch. 1562, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-7

.

11-24-8.
Civil action for discrimination against armed forces.

Any person who is debarred from the enjoyment, contrary to the provision of §

11-24-7

, shall be entitled to recover, in a civil action, from any corporation, association, or person guilty of the violation, his or her actual damages and one hundred dollars ($100) in addition, and evidence that the person debarred was at the time sober, orderly, and able and willing to pay for enjoyment in accordance with the rates fixed therefor for civilians shall be prima facie evidence in an action that he or she was debarred on account of his or her wearing the uniform or being in the military service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 32; P.L. 1908, ch. 1562, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

11-24-8

.